src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/N-paeae_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - pǟ: # Noun 14 'eng /est pea/fin' - full paradigm
     pǟ+N+Sg+Nom: pǟ
     pǟ+N+Sg+Gen: pǟ
     pǟ+N+Sg+Par: pǟdõ
     pǟ+N+Sg+Dat: pǟn
     pǟ+N+Sg+Ins: pǟkõks
     pǟ+N+Sg+Ill: [pǟʼzõ, pǟzõ]
     pǟ+N+Sg+Ela: pǟstõ
     pǟ+N+Pl+Nom: pǟd
     pǟ+N+Pl+Gen: pǟd 
     pǟ+N+Pl+Par: pēḑi
     pǟ+N+Pl+Dat: pǟdõn
     pǟ+N+Pl+Ins: pǟdkõks
     pǟ+N+Pl+Ill: [pēʼži, pēži]
     pǟ+N+Pl+Ela: pēšti
